Utah statutes.
26-28-113.   Delivery of document of gift not required -- Right to examine.

(1)  A document of gift need not be delivered during the donor's lifetime to be effective.

(2)  Upon or after an individual's death, a person in possession of a document of gift or a refusal to make an anatomical gift with respect to the individual shall allow examination and copying of the document of gift or refusal by a person authorized to make or object to the making of an anatomical gift with respect to the individual or by a person to which the gift could pass under Section 26-28-111.



Enacted by Chapter 60, 2007 General Session

